New York, session 2025-2026, S9438.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 250.50 of the penal law, as added by chapter 69 of 2 the laws of 2003, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 250.50 Unlawful surveillance in the first degree. 4 A person is guilty of unlawful surveillance in the first degree when 5 [he or she] such person: 6 1. commits the crime of unlawful surveillance in the second degree and 7 has been previously convicted within the past ten years of unlawful 8 surveillance in the first or second degree; or 9 2. commits the crime of unlawful surveillance in the second degree 10 against a person who has an active order of protection against them; or 11 3. commits the crime of unlawful surveillance in the second degree 12 against a person with the intent to benefit a person who has an active 13 order of protection against the person surveilled. 14 Unlawful surveillance in the first degree is a class D felony. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 16 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01931-01-5